District of Columbia statutes.
22-1707

“Gaming table” defined.

All games, devices, or contrivances at which money or any other thing shall be bet or wagered shall be deemed a gaming table within the meaning of §§ 22-1704 to 22-1706; and the courts shall construe said sections liberally, so as to prevent the mischief intended to be guarded against.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1331, ch. 854, § 868

History

Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 22-1507.
1973 Ed., § 22-1507.

Prior Codifications